Oklahoma, session 2026, SB2027.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 2 O.S. 2021, Section 7-414, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 7-414. A. The provisions of the Oklahoma Milk and Milk


Products Act shall not be construed to:


1. Include incidental sales of ungraded raw milk or raw milk


products directly to consumers at the farm where the ungraded raw


milk is or raw milk products are produced;


2. Preclude the advertising of the incidental sale of goat


milk; and


3. Preclude the advertising of the sale of ungraded raw milk or


raw milk products; and



Req. No. 2245 Page 1


4. Prohibit any farmer or producer from making cheese using


milk or cream produced on the farm of such farmer or producer.


B. For purposes of this section, incidental sales of goat milk


and milk products are those sales where the average monthly number


of gallons sold does not exceed one hundred (100) one thousand five


(1,500).


SECTION 2. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-2-2245 YG 1/15/2026 10:33:50 AM

























Req. No. 2245 Page 2